South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3873.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-3-35(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The Department of Education shall provide Office of the Attorney General shall have available to all school districts and open-enrollment charter schools inkless, in-home fingerprint and DNA identification kits to be distributedfor distribution throughout the district or school on request to the parent or legal custodian of any kindergarten, elementary, middle, or high school student. The kits must be provided to the parent or legal custodian of any kindergarten, elementary, middle, or high school student upon their request. The Department of Education shall provide student counts by district to inform the number of kits needed each year. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----